Maine, session 132, LD543.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4710-D is enacted to read:
§4710-D. Instruction in firearm hunter safety
1. Firearm hunter safety. The elements of a firearm hunter safety course must be
taught in all public and private schools, and successful completion of the course is required
for graduation from all secondary schools. The course, or its elements, must be taught no
later than grade 9 and must address the following topics:
A. Survival and first aid practices;
B. Landowner relations;
C. Hunter ethics;
D. The State's hunting laws;
E. Hands-on practice of safe firearms handling;
F. Hands-on instruction of map and compass usage and outdoor survival; and
G. Wildlife conservation and biology.
2. Successful completion; certificate. A student who successfully completes a
firearm hunter safety course under this section is entitled to a hunter safety certificate
provided by the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife and satisfies the requirement
in Title 12, section 11105.